District of Columbia statutes.
17-303

Appeals from administrative orders and decisions.

An appeal from an order or decision as provided for in section 11-722 , is commenced by filing, within the time prescribed pursuant to section 17-307(a) , the written petition for review provided by section 11 of the District of Columbia Administrative Procedure Act (§ 2-510). The District of Columbia Court of Appeals may prescribe the necessary rules and procedures for review of administrative orders and decisions, consistent with such section 11.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 614, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 565, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 146(a)(3)(A)

Section References

This section is referenced in § 17-304.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 17-303.
1973 Ed., § 17-303.